Utah statutes.
19-6-207.   Facility at site approved in siting plan -- Exemption from zoning and local approval requirements -- Transportation restrictions limited.

(1)  The construction or operation of a hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility at a site included within the siting plan is not required to conform to any local zoning or other land use regulation, law, or ordinance.

(2)  The owner of any hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility proposed to be located at a site included in the siting plan is not required to obtain approval of the site from any county or municipal planning commission or similar authority and no local unit of government may prohibit or unduly restrict the transportation of hazardous waste through the governmental unit to an approved hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

